North Dakota, session 69, HB1192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 53-06.1-03 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
a. An organization recognized as a public-spirited organization by the governing body of a
city or county may apply for permits. A local permit may allow the organization to conduct
only raffles, bingo, or sports pools. A restricted event permit may allow the organization to
conduct only raffles, bingo, sports pools, paddlewheels, twenty-one, and poker. The
organization or closely related organizations as a whole may only award a primary prize
that does not exceed eightfifteen thousand dollars and total prizes of all games do not
exceed fortyfifty thousand dollars per year. These maximum prize amounts do not apply
to raffles conducted under chapter 20.1-08. The determination of what is a
"public-spirited organization" is within the sole discretion of the governing body. An
organization shall disclose on the application its intended use of the net income from the
gaming activity. A governing body may issue a permit for games to be held at designated
times and places.

H. B. NO. 1192 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1192.
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 3 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 38 Nays 7 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State